ko: 스마트 TV 플랫폼: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; 파나소닉 My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; 기타
vi: Nền tảng TV thông minh: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Màn hình chính của tôi Panasonic; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Khác
es: Plataforma de Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Otros
ru: Платформа Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Другое
nb: Smart TV-plattform: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Annet
nl: Smart TV-platform: Android TV; Apple tv-besturingssysteem; Fire TV; Panasonic - Mijn startscherm; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Andere
fr: Plateforme de télévision intelligente: Android TV; tvOS Apple; Fire TV; My Home Screen Panasonic; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Autre
fi: Äly-TV-alusta: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Muu
el: Πλατφόρμα Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Άλλο
de: Smart-TV-Plattform: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Plataforma de Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Outro
pt-BR: Plataforma de Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Minha tela inicial da Panasonic; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Outro
da: Smart TV-platform: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Andet
sl-SI: Platforma pametne TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic Moj začetni zaslon; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Drugo
th: แพลตฟอร์มสมาร์ททีวี: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; พานาโซนิค หน้าจอหลักของฉัน; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Platformă Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Altele
tr: Akıllı TV platformu: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Diğer
hr-HR: Platforma za pametni televizor: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; WebOS; Ostalo
bg-BG: Платформа на Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Други
zh-CN: 智能电视平台: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic 我的主屏幕; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; 其他
hu: Okostévéplatform: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Egyéb
cs: Platforma Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Jiné
zh-TW: 智慧電視平台: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; 其他
ja: スマートテレビのプラットフォーム: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; その他
it: Piattaforma smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Altro
en: Smart TV platform: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Other
sk-SK: Platforma Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Iné
pl: Platforma Smart TV: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Inne
sv: Smart TV-plattform: Android TV; Apple tvOS; Fire TV; Panasonic My Home Screen; Roku TV; Tizen; Vizio SmartCast; webOS; Övrigt
lt-LT: Išmaniosios televizijos platforma: „Android TV“; „Apple TVOS“; „Fire TV“; „Panasonic My Home Screen“; „Roku TV“; „Tizen“; „Vizio SmartCast“; „webOS“; Kita